Tennessee, session 114, SB1634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-29-103(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(f) There is no cost to a petitioner for a proceeding under this section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-29-107(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting instead:
(c) There is no cost to a petitioner for an application under this section.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1634
009925
- 1 -